Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 2. Establishment and Organization

§ 5011.
Creation of Vermont Public Power Supply Authority.

Vermont Public Power Supply System, Inc., a corporation formed under the provisions of subdivision 4003(4) of this title, is hereby declared and established to be a body politic and corporate with duties and powers as are set forth in this chapter, to be known as “Vermont Public Power Supply Authority” to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The Authority is constituted a public instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions, and the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the State.

The Authority shall consist of those municipalities and cooperatives which by January 31, 1979 elected to become a member of Vermont Public Power Supply System, Inc., in accordance with the terms of its bylaws, and those Vermont municipalities and cooperatives that shall thereafter elect to become members of the Authority in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Authority established by it. These rules and regulations shall be calculated to permit membership without an undue burden on new members, but with regard to the benefits contributed to the Authority by its original members.

The powers of the Authority shall be exercised by a board of directors. The Board of Directors shall consist of one director from each member municipality or member cooperative, who shall be elected by the legislative body of each member municipality or the board of trustees of each member cooperative. Each municipality or cooperative may also elect an alternate director to serve in the absence or disability of its director. The term of office of a director shall be for one year coincident with the fiscal year of the Authority or until a successor director has been duly elected and qualified. Any director may be removed at the pleasure of the legislative body of the municipality or cooperative which elected that director, upon notice to the authority and the election of a successor director. The Board of Directors of the Authority shall adopt bylaws or other rules and regulations for the management of the affairs of the Authority and carrying out the purpose of this chapter. The Board of Directors shall also elect one of its member directors as chair of the Authority and shall also elect a treasurer and secretary who may be, but need not be, directors. It may elect other officers and agents as necessary to perform those acts commonly delegated to the officers and agents of a business corporation and shall set their compensation.

Despite any law or charter provision to the contrary, a director or officer of the Authority who is also an officer, employee, or member of a legislative body of a municipality or other public body or the State shall not thereby be precluded from voting or acting on behalf of the Authority on a matter involving the municipality or public body or the State. Neither shall service as a director or officer of the Authority constitute a conflict of interest for an officer, employee, or member of a municipality or public body or the State.

The Authority and its existence shall continue as long as it shall have notes, bonds, or other obligations or indebtedness outstanding, including notes, bonds, or other obligations or indebtedness hereafter issued or incurred, and until its existence is terminated by law. The net earnings of the Authority, beyond that necessary for retirement of its notes, bonds, or other obligations or indebtedness or to implement the public purposes and programs authorized in this chapter, shall not inure to the benefit of any person other than the State. Upon termination of the existence of the Authority, title to all of the property owned by the Authority, including any net earnings of the Authority, shall vest in the State. The State reserves the right at any time to alter, amend, repeal, or otherwise change the structure, organization, programs, or activities of the Authority, including the power to terminate the Authority, subject to any limitation on the impairment of the obligation of any contract or contracts entered into by the Authority.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5012.
General powers and duties.

The Authority shall have all of the powers necessary and convenient to carry out this chapter, including those general powers provided a business corporation by

11 V.S.A. § 1852

, and including the power:

To receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any gift, grant, donation, or appropriation of any property or money.

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise, or to obtain options for the acquisition of any property, real or personal, improved or unimproved, tangible or intangible, including an interest in land of less than the fee.

To sell, lease, mortgage, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property or interest in them, or to grant options for any of those purposes.

To pledge or assign any money, fees, charges, or other revenues of the Authority and any proceeds derived by the Authority from the sale of property, or from insurance or condemnation awards.

To employ personnel who shall serve at the pleasure of the directors.

To borrow money and issue its notes and bonds as provided in this chapter.

To purchase electric power and energy, including all or a portion of the capacity and output of one or more specific projects.

To sell electric power and energy and other products of projects to other utilities within the State, and to any person or utility outside the State. These other utilities are authorized to purchase electric power and energy sold by the Authority; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize resale of electric power and energy purchased from the Authority except as otherwise authorized by law.

To enter into joint ownership contracts and tenancies in common with any Vermont utility, whether or not such utility is a member of the Authority. With the consent of the Authority, utilities which are not members of the Authority shall be eligible to participate in projects sponsored by the Authority.

To contract for the use of transmission and distribution facilities owned by others for the delivery to purchasers of electric power and energy sold by the Authority. These other owners are authorized to enter into these contracts with the Authority.

To contract with respect to the purchase, sale, delivery, exchange, interchange, wheeling, pooling, transmission, or use of electric power and energy and to otherwise participate in intrastate, interstate, and international arrangements with respect to those matters, including a New England power pool as defined by chapter 14 of this title, except that this power shall not be exercised so as to conflict with or diminish in any way the powers and obligations of the Public Utility Commission under this title regarding planning and entering into agreements for the supply of electric power and energy.

Jointly with utilities or on its own, to plan, finance, acquire, construct, improve, purchase, operate, maintain, use, share costs of, own, lease, sell, dispose of, or otherwise participate in projects or portions of projects, the product or service from them, securities or obligations issued or incurred in connection with the financing of them, or research and development relating to them, within or outside the State. It may also enter into and perform contracts with any person with respect to the foregoing. If the Authority acquires or owns an interest as a tenant in common with others in any projects within the State, the surrender or waiver by the other property owner of its right to partition the property for a period not exceeding the period for which the property is used or useful for electric utility purposes shall not be invalid and unenforceable by reason of length of the period, or as unduly restricting the alienation of such property.

To apply to the appropriate agencies of the State, other states, the United States, and to any other proper agency for permits, licenses, certificates, or approvals which may be necessary, and to construct, maintain, and operate projects in accordance with these licenses, permits, certificates, or approvals.

To apply and contract for and to expend assistance from the United States or other sources, whether in form of a grant or loan or otherwise.

To enter into a contract or contracts to provide all requirements service, as defined in section 4002a of this title, with some or all of its member systems, upon receipt by the systems entering into such contract of the approvals required by section 4002a.

Upon entry into a contract with member systems pursuant to subdivision (15) of this section, to seek and obtain approval, in its own name, for projects and contracts otherwise requiring approval under section 248 or 2902 of this title.

To make and execute all contracts and agreements and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the Authority under this chapter.

To enter into contracts determined by the Authority to be useful for the prudent management of its assets, purchases, funds, debts, or fuels, including interest rate or other swaps, option contracts, future contracts, forward purchase contracts, hedging contracts, and leases or other risk management instruments to the full extent that a business corporation is authorized to enter into such contracts.

To acquire stock, shares, securities, membership units, or other equity or participation interests in entities that directly or indirectly construct, own, or operate electric generation or transmission facilities within or outside the State to the full extent that a business corporation is authorized to acquire such interests.

To do all things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapter or the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3; amended

1991, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 15, 1992;

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 39, eff. April 15, 2010.

§ 5013.
Special powers.

The Authority may contract to sell, and member municipalities and cooperatives and other utilities may contract to purchase, all or a portion of the capacity and output of one or more specific projects including contracts providing for planning, engineering, design, acquiring sites or options for sites, and expenses preliminary or incidental to such project. This contract may be for the life of a project or other term or for an indefinite period; may provide for the payment of unconditional obligations imposed without regard to whether a project is undertaken, completed, operable, or operating and despite the suspension, interruption, interference, reduction, or curtailment of the output of a project; and may contain provisions for prepayment, nonunanimous amendment, arbitration, delegation, and other matters deemed necessary or desirable to carry out its purposes. This contract may also provide, in the event of default by any party to the contract in the performance of its obligations under the contract, for other parties to assume the obligations and succeed to the rights and interests of the defaulting party, pro rata or otherwise as may be agreed upon in the contract.

Neither the obligations of the Authority nor the obligations of any member municipality or cooperative or other utility under any contract authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed to constitute an indebtedness or a lending of credit of the Authority or any such municipality, cooperative, or other utility or shall be included in computing the borrowing capacity of the Authority, or any such municipality, cooperative, or other utility. These obligations of such municipalities and cooperatives shall be treated as expenses of operating their electric plants. In the case of municipalities, these obligations shall constitute special obligations of such municipalities payable solely from the revenues and other monies derived by them from their electric departments or systems. The liability of these municipalities from other funds is limited to obligations undertaken by them to pay for the electric power and energy used by them.

A municipality or cooperative shall be obligated to fix, revise, and collect fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities, and commodities furnished or supplied through its electric system at least sufficient to provide revenues adequate to meet its obligations under any such output and capacity contract and to pay all other amounts payable from or constituting a charge and lien upon those revenues.

Any member municipality or cooperative may convey, transfer, or assign to the Authority, with or without consideration, any real or personal property or interest in either, including a leasehold estate.

The Authority and any member municipality or cooperative or other utility (whether or not such utility is a member of the Authority) that is acting pursuant to a contract with the Authority may expend its funds, including the proceeds of its notes, bonds, or other obligations, for the purposes of modifying demand for electric capacity or energy through conservation or load management by participation in such facilities, projects, and programs as the Board of the Authority or the legislative body or other governing body or the governing board of the member municipality or cooperative or other utility, as the case may be, determines will effectively accomplish such purposes. Such facilities, projects, and programs may include providing or financing facilities or projects for conservation or load management, which may be: owned or operated by the Authority or any member municipality or cooperative or other utility or by others; leased or licensed by the Authority or any member municipality or cooperative or other utility to others, or financed by loans by the Authority or any member municipality or cooperative or other utility to others, in either case on such terms and conditions as the Board of the Authority or the legislative body or other governing body or the governing board of the member municipality or cooperative or other utility, as the case may be, may determine. Any member municipality or cooperative or other utility may issue its notes, bonds, or other obligations pursuant to any statutory authority conferring such power for carrying out the purposes of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3; amended

1989, No. 112

, §§ 2, 4, eff. June 22, 1989;

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 40, eff. April 15, 2010.

§ 5014.
Acquisition of property.

The Authority may acquire real property, or any interest in it, by eminent domain in accordance with the provisions of sections 110 through 124 of this title; provided, however, that:

No property already appropriated to public use shall be so taken except to the extent and for the purposes permitted by sections 110 through 124 of this title.

No facility for the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric power and energy owned by any person shall be so taken except for the purpose of acquiring property or rights in it in order to permit the crossing of existing transmission or distribution facilities. Any taking under sections 110 through 124 of this title shall be governed by the provisions of these sections which are applicable to public utilities.

No site for a project for which any utility had filed an application for a preliminary permit or a license from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission on or before November 1, 1977 shall be so taken until such time, if ever, that the application is denied, and no further renewals or appeals are available to the utility, or the utility abandons its application, permit, or license.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5015.
Tax exemption.

All bonds or notes issued under this chapter are issued by a body corporate and politic of this State and for an essential public and governmental purpose. Those bonds and notes, and the interest on them and the income from them, including any profit on their sale, and all activities of the Authority and fees, charges, funds, revenues, incomes, and other monies of the Authority whether or not pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of those bonds or notes, or interest on them, are exempt from all taxation, franchise fees, or special assessments of whatever kind except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

The Authority is not required to make or file any reports, statements, or informational returns required of any utility or other bodies corporate except as provided in this chapter.

Real and personal property, situated within the State and owned by the Authority shall be exempt from property taxation. The Authority shall, in lieu of property taxes, pay to any governmental body authorized to levy local property taxes the amount which would be assessable as local property taxes on the real and tangible personal property if that property were the property of a utility. These payments shall be due, and bear interest if unpaid, as in the case of taxes on the property of a utility. For purposes of these payments in lieu of taxes, the assessors of the taxing authority shall make a valuation and assessment of the property and determine the tax that would be assessable if the property were owned by a utility. Payments in lieu of taxes made under this chapter shall be treated in the same manner as taxes for the purposes of all procedural and substantive provisions of law, including appeals, now and hereinafter in effect applicable to assessment and taxation of real and personal property, collection, and abatement of these taxes and the raising of public revenues.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5016.
Rules and rates.

The Authority may make and enforce rules and regulations which it deems necessary or desirable. It may establish, levy, and collect or may authorize by contract, franchise, lease, or otherwise, the establishment, levying, and collection of rents, rates, and other charges:

for the services afforded by the Authority or afforded by or in connection with any project or properties which it may construct, erect, acquire, own, operate, or control, or with respect to which it may have any interest or any right to capacity thereof; and

for the sale of electric energy or of generation or transmission capacity or service as it may deem necessary, proper, desirable, and reasonable.

Rents, rates, and other charges shall be at least sufficient to meet the expenses of the Authority, including operating and maintenance expenses, reasonable reserves, interest, and principal payments, including payments into one or more sinking funds for the retirement of principal, and other requirements of any trust agreement or resolution securing bonds or notes. The Authority may pledge its rates, rents, and other revenues, or any part of them, as security for the repayment, with interest and redemption premiums, if any, of any monies borrowed by it or advanced to it for any of its authorized purposes and as security for the payment of amounts due and owing by it under any contract.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5017.
Powers of municipalities.

A municipality may by resolution of its legislative body enter into contracts with the Authority for the purchase, sale, exchange, or transmission of electric energy and other services, on such terms and for such period of time as the resolution may provide. A municipality may by resolution of its legislative body enter into a contract with the Authority related to the issuance of bonds and notes as authorized by section 5031 of this title only after an affirmative vote of the qualified voters at any duly warned annual or special meeting held for that purpose. The required vote may either approve a specific contract with the Authority or it may approve generally the right for the municipality to enter into all such contracts with the Authority by resolution of its legislative body. A municipality may appropriate electricity-derived revenues received in any year to make payments due during that year under any contract made by the municipality with the Authority. Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal any charter provision or law requiring an election or other condition precedent to the establishment of a municipal electric plant.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3; amended

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. April 15, 2010.

§ 5018.
Construction contracts.

The Authority may contract for the planning, acquisition, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, extension, and improvement of any project, or may contract with other public or private owners of any project to perform these functions, without advertising for bids, preparing final plans and specifications in advance of construction or securing performance and payment bonds, except to the extent that the directors determine that these actions are desirable in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.
Except as otherwise provided by this section, no contract shall be invalid or unenforceable by reason of nonperformance of the conditions required by any other law relating to public contracts.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.